Massachusetts, session 194th, S1134.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 133 of Chapter 127 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the last sentence.
SECTION 2. Section 3 of Chapter 279 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out the third sentence and inserting in place thereof the following 4
sentences:-
If such suspended sentence is to the state prison and is revoked, the sentence shall be in
full force and effect. If such suspended sentence is to the house of correction and is revoked, the
court shall have discretion to impose (i) the full term of the suspended sentence; or (ii) a portion
of the suspended sentence with the remaining balance suspended. If the court imposes a portion
of the suspended sentence, then the remaining balance of the suspended sentence and the length
of 2

of time for which the balance is suspended shall be reduced by the time served on revocation. If
the court imposes less than the full term of the suspended sentence, the court shall also have
discretion to revise the conditions of probation.
of 2